Washington statutes.
RCW 43.52.440

Effect of chapter on "Columbia River Sanctuary Act."

Nothing contained in this chapter shall be construed to amend, modify or repeal in any manner *RCW 77.55.160, commonly known as the "Columbia River Sanctuary Act", and all matter herein contained shall be expressly subject to such act.

[ 2003 c 39 s 26; 1983 1st ex.s. c 46 s 178; 1965 c 8 s 43.52.440. Prior: 1953 c 281 s 23.]

NOTES:

*Reviser's note: RCW 77.55.160 was recodified as RCW 77.55.191 pursuant to 2005 c 146 s 1001.